Malays.dic
adik/bqrg
alang/hk
alkohol/c
ampun/e
angan/BMTD
keanggotaan/b
angkaan/R
mengantara/l
anugerah/hb
apa/kpsnb
mengapa/knlp
aplikasikan/DM
araklah/B
atasan/bP
awak/pz
keayuan/brq
azam/bqr
membabar/n
babas/T
pelbagai/DAny
bagaimana/skp
bahagia/Bpb
bahasakan/DMQEb
bajing/h
membakar/nb
terbalikkan/DNb
balut/Pbha
dibalut/lnb
banding/SPM
bangkitan/Kb
bantuan/bRP
perbanyak/DAz
berbapa/ny
barbar/c
pembatal/h
bayar/BPTX
beban/bqr
belaan/PKb
belahnya/TMD
belang/B
belat/M
membeliak/z
membelit/nl
benar/bpnkye
sebenar/bg
berapa/kp
memberat/nly
beri/bpeyh
pemberi/hauv
bersih/bpe
bersihkan/DMb
kebersihan/b
pembersih/h
besar/BMPSTEQ
betapa/s
betul/bpke
betulkannya/MQRD
membiak/zby
biar/pnkbsey
biasa/bpe
bincangkan/DMQEb
bisa/Bk
bisik/PBT
bising/bp
kebodohan/bqr
bodohkan/DMQE
bohong/bhp
membolos/ln
bom/Fb
pengebom/bha
bongkaran/PK
memborak/z
membuah/nl
buatnya/DMPQE
budak/BK
budakan/PR
diperbudak/z
buka/bnhpaey
bukan/bkp
bunga/bhq
bunuh/ph
buru/BDMTP
busa/BMP
but/b
butir/BS
mencacak/z
cam/e
pengecam/bha
campakkan/DMb
mencandu/l
cap/BDFH
capnya/DFH
cas/FHb
cat/BDFH
catnya/FH
catuk/DMT
catutan/PR
mencebur/nlm
cek/MFH
mencela/n
cemar/TB
cepat/SBMPREQ
cepatkannya/MQE
cerdaskan/MC
menceroboh/lm
mencetak/z
cinta/blnfoqr
mencinta/lnmo
cita/bpnqr
comelan/Kb
cucuk/BDMTPS
cucukkan/DM
penculik/hb
cuma/R
mencumbu/lm
cungkil/DMPB
mencurah/nly
curi/DMPb
percutian/bq
dah/p
mendahaga/ni
dalamkan/MQEQ
dalaman/KW
didandan/l
dapur/S
pendarah/ha
mendarat/lnym
debar/B
perdebatkan/DA
dengar/BMDTEQ
dengarkan/MEQb
deria/bh
didih/BM
diri/bqr
berdiri/pb
pendiri/hauv
dohok/T
berdosa/bpk
perduakan/AD
duduk/Tp
pendudukan/K
duga/DMTP
edarkan/MDQE
ekar/SB
ekori/DMb
mengembun/nl
enam/BKR
encik/BQ
fail/nJD
fasakh/J
feudal/c
fikir/bnhqauve
memikir/nly
fitnah/JD
fitnahkan/DJ
fokus/J
fokuskan/DJ
foto/J
fundamental/bc
gadai/BDMTP
gaji/bhn
galak/MBTPD
mengganjak/z
menggantung/lnby
gelecek/MT
gelut/BM
gempur/MD
digenggam/bnl
gengster/cb
gentari/DMQ
gerak/BPTS
geseran/BRP
ghairah/b
giat/BMPQER
gilir/puv
goyangan/K
guru/bp
habiskan/DMTb
had/BTH
hadkan/DMF
hadnya/TH
hal/bq
halusi/DMREQ
hamba/MQBE
hangat/BMQET
menghantu/lm
hanyutan/BP
penghapus/h
mengharum/nl
harus/pkb
haruskan/DM
pemerhati/hab
hebatkan/RMDQE
hendak/zpb
kehendak/Srbq
kehendaki/DLb
henti/bS
terhenti/pb
hias/BMDTP
hiasi/MQDb
hiasan/Rb
hidup/bqrpe
kehidupan/bqr
hilir/bha
hisabkan/DMT
hitam/MK
hormat/npj
menghunjam/n
ideal/cbp
ikon/bq
ikut/BMPTQE
import/MDPb
inga/T
ingati/MQDE
ingatinya/DMQ
ingatan/Rb
keinginan/bqr
iras/SM
pengirit/h
isih/BMPD
memperisteri/ny
itu/pk
jaga/BTDMP
jalan/SBTPWM
menjamak/z
jangan/pn
jangka/DMnby
jangkitan/BKRP
jantina/S
jarang/Q
menjauh/lnmy
jebik/T
dijelajah/lm
jelangak/M
jelaskan/DMQER
jenis/Sbr
jerongkok/MT
jinjit/MTB
jirus/MD
jual/hanpy
juang/WMD
perjuang/DAny
jujur/S
berjumbai/h
junjungan/BR
juru/MP
kejuruteraan/b
kacaukan/MDQ
kafan/BL
kafankan/LD
kahak/BL
kahwinkan/MD
kaji/MLDTU
kajinya/LDU
kajian/PUb
kakak/bqrpg
kakanda/q
kalau/ps
kami/p
kampung/bpqe
kandang/S
dikandung/lnm
kapas/K
kapital/cb
mengapur/nl
mengaram/n
karya/BU
karyanya/U
kasih/nlqrb
mengasih/lnmof
kekasih/bqrh
kasihan/nylpbj
kata/nebpqr
perkatakan/DAb
kategori/L
kategorikan/DL
kebun/BWPS
mengecek/z
kecilkan/MDQE
kecilan/KRP
kedai/BTW
kedek/TM
mengejar/blnmy
kelabuan/K
kelabut/B
kelentung/h
kelibat/MS
keliling/BSW
keluarkan/DMb
keluarga/bpqrg
berkembang/hbpd
kemendang/BM
mengena/lnmy
berkena/ha
kenal/BTPDRQE
kenalkannya/MQE
kenan/BQR
kenang/Tn
mengenang/nlbyr
kenapa/kp
mengencang/nl
kerja/SWb
kerjakan/MDQE
kerung/h
pengerusikan/ADb
kerut/BMT
kesannya/PM
ketil/SBMD
khabarkan/DLB
khaskan/DL
khatamkan/DL
khatankan/LD
khayal/BLT
khayalan/Ub
khemah/B
khianat/ULB
khianati/DL
khuatiri/DL
khuatirkan/DL
khususkan/DL
khutbah/BU
kiat/BTM
kilang/PMWb
kili/KM
kirakan/MQDE
kirim/BDMPW
kiriman/PRWb
kitaran/RP
kobar/Bp
kodkan/DL
komersialkan/DL
konon/bgp
koreksi/L
kritik/LUDb
kuat/SBPTQE
kuatkan/MQDEb
kekuatan/bqr
kukuh/BSQER
kunci/BMDTPK
kurungkan/DM
kutikel/b
melagak/z
lagi/nps
lain/pbng
lalaikan/MQD
lamat/h
lambat/TQES
lampau/TP
lamun/MPD
lancar/SPMT
langgan/BMPD
melangkau/lm
lanjutan/BPRK
lantun/ha
lap/nDF
melapik/lz
menyelaras/ny
berlauk/z
dilayan/blm
pelayar/hab
dilayur/n
berlebih/h
kelemahan/bqr
lembak/M
lembar/S
lembu/QE
melentik/z
lenting/MP
lepaskan/DRQb
melepas/lmnyp
lepasan/KPR
lesbian/c
liberal/c
melihat/lnb
perlihatkan/DA
penglihat/hau
melimpah/lnm
lindungannya/R
melintas/lmb
loncat/TP
melunak/lz
memperlunak/z
lupaan/Kb
luputkan/DM
maaf/ep
bermaaf/hd
dimadu/ny
dimahkotakan/b
mahu/bsnpy
kemahuan/bqr
mainkan/DMQEb
mainan/RCb
makcik/bqpg
makrifat/B
malukan/DMQE
mana/npk
mandikan/DMBQE
kemarah/hauv
memarah/lmny
dimarah/lm
maruah/bqr
masaknya/MDS
masuk/plbe
material/c
kemegahan/bqr
mendapan/Pb
mentua/bqr
mesti/pbk
milik/bqrj
berminat/p
minggu/hab
permintaan/bqr
misal/hab
memuat/nylm
mudi/PK
memuktamad/ny
muliakan/MDQE
kenaifan/bqr
naik/blzp
dinaik/lzmy
nama/bqrpg
penanti/hau
natural/c
naungan/Rb
menyanyi/nyp
senyawakan/DVQE
opera/b
mengoperasi/ny
pada/bqrp
memada/lnj
berpadan/hd
memagar/lnmy
pakai/hanyp
pakcik/bqpg
paling/BMS
pam/DFbn
memanah/lnb
pancang/MTD
pancing/TMDP
pandang/hapbuv
berpandang/hd
memandang/nbl
pangkalan/BS
panjang/STMBDQE
pantasnya/S
papar/han
memapar/ny
pasangan/bP
pasti/bpke
patok/h
patriot/c
patuh/bpj
pedulikan/DAb
pejal/W
memekak/z
pelesiran/BK
penting/bpnk
peperangan/b
percayakan/DAb
percuma/pb
peribadi/bqr
keperibadian/br
pemeriksa/hab
memeriksa/nbl
perlu/bpk
peronyok/TA
pesan/hbpnqrauv
pimpinan/Kbrq
pinangan/brq
piuh/BTM
memondok/z
popularkan/DA
pos/bnF
pengepos/bha
profesional/cb
programkan/DA
protes/ADb
kepulangan/bqr
kepunyaan/bqr
pupuskan/MD
pusaka/B
pusingan/PSR
diraba/bl
keracunan/bkp
seragaman/KP
ramah/BKP
merancang/bny
rangkaikan/DMb
merangkak/lz
rangkul/DMC
perantau/ahv
kerapuhan/bg
rasa/BDMPSTX
rasanya/p
perasaan/bqr
ratu/brq
ratus/BMC
merecik/lz
regang/BTX
rejam/Mn
rela/blnyejp
relevan/bk
merenang/lmn
renggangan/K
rengkuh/DMb
rentang/DMlny
renyak/Mz
perinci/ADT
merindu/lnmob
ringkas/MD
rintih/bhauv
risikan/Pb
roboh/bpnye
robohkan/DMb
romantis/bpc
rona/BS
ronyok/DMzy
ruang/hba
rugi/bpgn
merugi/ny
merujuk/zblm
dirujuk/zblm
diruncing/ln
rupa/br
serupaan/KR
sabdakan/DV
sabit/BMPDW
sabitkan/DV
sabotaj/DV
sadai/BT
sahabat/bpqr
salah/bnpqreky
menyalah/nly
persalahkan/DA
persalin/ADnl
sanggup/pkb
santunan/PK
sap/F
sapa/bha
saringan/P
sasar/DMTV
sasarkan/DMVb
saudara/bpqr
sawangan/RW
sayang/bjqgk
sebutan/Pb
bersedia/bpk
segankan/DM
segera/Bp
menyeksa/nl
persekutukan/DA
selangan/BR
selat/MTb
selekeh/blg
semaian/RPWb
sempurna/pbe
senak/MTK
senang/bpg
senda/Bp
senggerah/h
persengketakan/DA
sensasikan/DVb
sensual/c
sentil/TMDn
senyap/BPb
senyuman/brq
bersepai/ph
kesepian/bqr
serlah/MDTb
servis/DV
sia/BTVDEQ
siakan/EQb
menyiang/lm
siapa/pks
sesiapa/s
siar/TBPW
menyinggah/ln
sirap/MTD
sisi/bqr
menyisip/nlymb
skru/DVZb
skrukan/DVb
solek/BDMW
solekan/Rb
soroti/DMb
sosialis/cl
spirit/c
stabilkan/VDb
standardkan/DV
stor/Vb
storan/Z
struktur/BVZ
strukturkan/DVb
sudi/pek
suka/bnpy
sukuan/KRb
sulamkan/MBb
sumbat/DMPTb
suntik/DMPb
bersurai/p
suruh/DMBPWT
susahkan/DM
swastakan/DV
syairkan/DV
syampu/Vb
syarah/Zb
syarat/BX
syaratkan/DV
syariat/DV
syukuri/VDb
taati/DNb
tadbir/DNOb
tadbirkan/ND
tadbiran/Ob
tafsir/DNO
tafsirkan/ND
tafsiran/Ob
tafsirnya/NO
pertahan/nAD
tahkikkan/NDb
tahrifkan/DN
tahunan/RWb
takdirkan/DN
takrif/DNn
taksir/NDO
taksirkan/NDM
taksiran/Ob
talak/N
talkinkan/DN
tamat/pb
tampin/SBM
tandanya/MPW
tandatangan/DMlm
pertandingkan/DA
tanggungan/bPR
tani/WB
tapa/BR
tauliahkan/DN
pertautkan/DAb
tertawakan/DNb
ditawar/nlmjy
tegak/MSBTP
tegaskan/DM
tekan/DMTPB
tenun/BMDP
tenusu/O
tenyeh/DMbny
terjemah/DNO
terjemahkan/DN
terjemahan/O
terjun/bp
ternak/DNOB
ternakan/Ob
tetapan/KP
tidak/bpk
pertiga/SA
tindas/DMTP
meninggalkan/bqr
tinggi/bpgr
tinggikan/DMQb
tip/F
menokoh/nl
tolol/b
tolongan/R
tontonlah/P
pertontonkan/DA
transformasikan/DN
tualang/BW
pertuan/DAn
tulus/S
tumbesar/ha
tumpil/M
tunjuk/DMPWB
turunkan/DMEb
menurut/bm
ukuran/PB
utilitarian/c
utusan/Rb
sewajar/bg
wajibkan/DM
wang/bpq
wap/BH
wenang/bh
wilayah/bq
yakin/pley
zakar/b
